Utah statutes.
31A-22-203.   Notice and proof of loss.

Section 31A-21-312 applies to the notice required under liability policies.  Subsection 31A-21-312(1) may not be construed to extend the normal provisions of any claims-made coverage that required notice of an occurrence or claim prior to the expiration of the policy for coverage to be in force.

